Illinois, session 104th, HB1266.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Department of Government Efficiency Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) The government of the State of Illinois lacks 9    efficiency, which costs taxpayers money.10        (2) The government of the State of Illinois has 11    enacted at least some unnecessary or redundant laws, which 12    make conducting business in this State more difficult than 13    necessary.14        (3) The government of the State of Illinois has 15    adopted at least some unnecessary or redundant 16    administrative rules, which make conducting business in 17    this State more difficult than necessary.18        (4) The government of the State of Illinois contains 19    at least some parts of State agencies that are unnecessary 20    or redundant, which costs taxpayers money.21    Therefore, the General Assembly directs the establishment 22of a Department of Government Efficiency to provide advice to 23policymakers to help save taxpayers in this State money and to   HB1266- 2 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1help make conducting business in this State easier. 2    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 3requires otherwise:4    "Board of Directors" or "Board" means the Board of 5Directors of the Department of Government Efficiency 6established under this Act.7    "Chairperson" means the Chairperson of the Board of 8Directors of the Department of Government Efficiency 9established under this Act.10    "Confidential information" means information that may not 11be publicly disclosed by State or federal law, rule, or 12regulation.13    "Department" means the Department of Government Efficiency 14established in the Office of the Auditor General under this 15Act.16    "Director" means a director on the Board of Directors of 17the Department of Government Efficiency established under this 18Act.19    "Member" means a member of the Department of Government 20Efficiency established under this Act, as appointed by the 21Board of Directors under Section 25 of this Act.22    "State agency" means:23        (1) each officer, board, commission, and agency 24    created by the Constitution in the executive branch of 25    State government;  HB1266- 3 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1        (2) each officer, department, board, commission, 2    agency, institution, authority, university, and body 3    politic and corporate in the executive branch of State 4    government;5        (3) each administrative unit or corporate outgrowth in 6    the executive branch of State government that is created 7    by or pursuant to statute;8        (4) each administrative unit or corporate outgrowth of 9    an entity described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3); and10        (5) each administrative unit or corporate outgrowth as 11    may be created by executive order of the Governor.12    "State agency head" means the director of a State agency 13or the individual or group of individuals in whom the ultimate 14legal authority for a State agency is vested by any provision 15of law.16    "State leader" means a State agency head or a member of the 17General Assembly. 18    Section 15. Department of Government Efficiency. 19    (a) The Department of Government Efficiency is established 20in the Office of the Auditor General to serve as an advisory 21and consulting organization to provide recommendations or 22strategies for State leaders for the following purposes:23        (1) regulatory rescissions;24        (2) administrative reductions; and25        (3) cost savings.  HB1266- 4 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1    (b) The Office of the Auditor General shall provide 2administrative and other support to the Department.3    (c) The Department may advise the Office of the Auditor 4General regarding audits and investigations under Section 30 5of this Act for the purposes described in Section 5 and 6subsection (a) of this Section. 7    Section 20. Board of Directors.8    (a) The Department shall be led by a Board of Directors, 9which shall be chaired by a Chairperson who shall be elected 10annually at the first meeting of the year from among the 11directors. The Board shall make decisions and take actions by 12majority vote. The directors on the Board shall be as follows:13        (1) the Auditor General or the Auditor General's 14    designee, who shall serve as Chairperson until the first 15    meeting under this Act;16        (2) one director, appointed by the President of the 17    Senate;18        (3) one director, appointed by the Speaker of the 19    House;20        (4) one director, appointed by the Minority Leader of 21    the Senate; and22        (5) one director, appointed by the Minority Leader of 23    the House of Representatives.24    (b) Each director appointed under paragraph (2), (3), (4), 25or (5) of subsection (a) may serve for a period of 2 years and   HB1266- 5 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1may be reappointed to the position or a new appointment may be 2made under subsection (a) of this Section. A director 3appointed under paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subsection 4(a) may be discharged and removed by the Board. A director may 5resign before the end of the director's term. A vacancy may be 6filled by appointment under subsection (a) at any time.7    (c) The Board shall convene and meet at the call of the 8Chairperson and shall meet as frequently as necessary to carry 9out its duties as required by this Act.10    (d) The Board may obtain and review information from a 11State agency under subsection (a) of Section 30. 12    (e) The directors shall serve without compensation but 13shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary 14expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose. 15    Section 25. Members.16    (a) The Board may appoint members in the Department who 17shall serve under the Board. Each member appointed shall be:18        (1) an expert with training or experience as a 19    corporate efficiency consultant, organizational 20    effectiveness consultant, management consultant, or the 21    equivalent;22        (2) an expert with academic or teaching experience in 23    government, economics, political science, or a similar 24    discipline;25        (3) an expert with significant experience with   HB1266- 6 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1    business management; or2        (4) an expert with significant experience with 3    government management.4    (b) The members shall assist the Board in advising, 5consulting, and providing recommendations or strategies for 6State leaders. The members may assist the Board in advising 7the Office of the Auditor General regarding audits and 8investigations under Section 30, in reviewing information 9obtained by the Board under subsection (a) of Section 30, in 10drafting and publishing reports under Section 35, or in any 11other task assigned by the Board. The members serve at the will 12of the Board, and members may be discharged and removed by the 13Board without cause.14    (c) One or more members shall convene and meet at the call 15of any director and shall meet as frequently as necessary to 16carry out duties as assigned by any director.17    (d) The members of the Department shall serve without 18compensation but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and 19necessary expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose. 20    Section 30. Powers; audits and investigations; rulemaking. 21    (a) At the request of the Board, a State agency head shall 22provide all information requested by the Board and possessed 23by the State agency to the Board, except as otherwise 24prohibited by law.25    (b) The Department may advise the Office of the Auditor   HB1266- 7 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1General regarding audits and investigations of State agencies 2for the purposes described in Section 5 and subsection (a) of 3Section 15 of this Act.4    (c) The Office of the Auditor General may consult with the 5Department under Section 6-2 of the Illinois State Auditing 6Act regarding audits and investigations of State agencies.7    (d) The Department may adopt rules implementing this Act, 8including rules to provide for policies and procedures for the 9Board, policies and procedures for members, policies and 10procedures for reports, and other policies and procedures to 11otherwise accomplish the purposes of this Act. 12    Section 35. Reports. The Department shall identify issues 13and make recommendations by issuing quarterly reports to the 14Governor and the General Assembly. The Department may also 15address reports to a State agency head at the discretion of the 16Board. The substance of each report shall identify issues and 17make recommendations based on the purposes described in 18Section 5 and subsection (a) of Section 15 of this Act. 19    Section 40. The Illinois State Auditing Act is amended by 20adding Section 6-2 as follows: 21    (30 ILCS 5/6-2 new)22    Sec. 6-2. Department of Government Efficiency. The Auditor 23General may consult with the Department of Government   HB1266- 8 -LRB104 03979 BDA 14003 b1Efficiency established in the Office of the Auditor General 2under the Department of Government Efficiency Act regarding 3audits and investigations under this Act.